test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mu_gt-norm.yaml
     му+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: муэзнытлӧн
     му+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: муэзнытлісь
     му+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: муэзнытлӧ
     му+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: муэзнытӧ
     му+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: муэзнаныт
     му+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: муэзныткӧт
     му+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [муэзныттӧг, муэзтӧгьяныт]
     му+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: муэзнытла
     му+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: муэзнытся
     му+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: муэзаныт
     му+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [муэзсиныт, муэсиныт]
     му+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: муэзаныт
     му+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [муэзнытлань, муэзланяныт]
     му+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [муэзнытсянь, муэзсяняныт]
     му+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [муэзӧттяныт, муэзӧттиныт]
     му+N+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [муэзӧдззаныт, муэзӧдззиныт]
     му+N+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: муэзнытви
     му+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: муэзланяныт
     му+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: муэзланьсиныт
     му+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: муэзланяныт
     му+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [муэзланьсяняныт, муэзнытланьсянь]
     му+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [муэзланьӧттяныт, муэзланьӧттиныт, муэзнытланьӧт]
     му+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [муэзланьӧдззаныт, муэзланьӧдззиныт, муэзнытланьӧдз]
     му+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: муэзнытланьви
     му+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: муэзныс
     му+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: муэзныслӧн
     му+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: муэзныслісь
     му+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: муэзныслӧ
     му+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: муэзнысӧ
     му+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: муэзнаныс
     му+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: муэзныскӧт
     му+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [муэзныстӧг, муэзтӧгьяныс]
     му+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: муэзнысла
     му+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: муэзнысся
     му+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: муэзаныс
     му+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [муэзсиныс, муэсиныс]
     му+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: муэзаныс
     му+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [муэзныслань, муэзланяныс]
     му+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [муэзныссянь, муэзсяняныс]
     му+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [муэзӧттяныс, муэзӧттиныс]
     му+N+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [муэзӧдззаныс, муэзӧдззиныс]
     му+N+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: муэзнысви
     му+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: муэзланяныс
     му+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: муэзланьсиныс
     му+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: муэзланяныс
     му+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [муэзланьсяняныс, муэзнысланьсянь]
     му+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [муэзланьӧттяныс, муэзланьӧттиныс, муэзнысланьӧт]
     му+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [муэзланьӧдззаныс, муэзланьӧдззиныс, муэзнысланьӧдз]
     му+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: муэзнысланьви
